Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 26 Kidnapping

11-26-1.
Kidnapping.

Whoever, without lawful authority, forcibly or secretly confines or imprisons another person within this state against his or her will, or forcibly carries or sends another person out of this state, or forcibly seizes or confines or inveigles or kidnaps another person with intent either to cause him or her to be secretly confined or imprisoned within this state against his or her will or to cause him or her to be sent out of this state against his or her will, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years.

Where the provisions of The Domestic Violence Prevention Act, chapter 29 of title 12, are applicable, the penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided in §

12-29-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 21; P.L. 1909, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 21; P.L. 1932, ch. 1866, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

11-26-1

; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 10.

11-26-1.1.
Childsnatching.

Any person who intentionally removes, causes the removal of, or detains any child under the age of eighteen (18) years, whether within or without the state of Rhode Island, with intent to deny another person’s right of custody under an existing decree or order of the family court, shall be guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for a term not more than two (2) years, or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

It shall be an affirmative defense that:

The person at the time of the alleged violation had lawful custody of the child pursuant to a court order granting legal custody or visitation rights;

The person had physical custody of the child pursuant to a court order granting legal custody or visitation rights and failed to return the child as a result of circumstances beyond his or her control, and the person notified and disclosed to the other parent or legal custodian the specific whereabouts of the child and a means by which the child could be contacted or made a reasonable attempt to notify the other parent or lawful custodian of the child of the circumstances and made that disclosure within twenty-four (24) hours after the visitation period had expired and returned the child as soon as possible; or

The person was fleeing an incidence or pattern of domestic violence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 10; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 6.

11-26-1.2.
Abduction of child prior to court order.

Any parent, or any person acting pursuant to directions from the parent, who shall, after being served with process in an action affecting the family, but prior to the issuance of a temporary or final order determining custody of a minor child, take or entice a child away from the family unit, whether within or without the state of Rhode Island, for the purpose of depriving the other parent of physical custody of the child for a period greater than fifteen (15) days, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for a term up to two (2) years, or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

No person shall be deemed to have violated this section if the action:

Is taken to protect the child from imminent physical harm;

Is taken by a parent fleeing from imminent physical harm to himself or herself;

Is consented to by both parents; or

Is otherwise authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 349, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 6.

11-26-1.3.
Missing child — Duty to investigate.

Whenever a parent notifies a local or state police department that his or her minor child and the child’s other parent have been missing for at least one week and that their whereabouts are unknown, the police department shall immediately conduct an investigation to ascertain the location of the missing parent and child. However, there shall not be a duty to investigate when the notification is provided by a noncustodial parent denied visitation pursuant to an order of the family court and the parent in possession of the child has custody of the child pursuant to an order of the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 251, § 2.

11-26-1.4.
Kidnapping of a minor.

Whoever, without lawful authority, forcibly or secretly confines or imprisons any child under the age of sixteen (16) years within this state against the child’s will, or forcibly carries or sends the child out of this state, or forcibly seizes, confines, inveigles, or kidnaps the child with intent either to cause the child to be secretly confined or imprisoned within this state against his or her will, or with the intent of sexually assaulting or molesting the child as defined in chapter 37 of this title, or with the intent to abuse the child as defined in chapter 9 of this title, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for life or for any term not less than twenty (20) years. However, nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to make the reasonable lawful acts of a parent in caring for his or her child a violation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 451, § 1.

11-26-1.5.
Enticement of children.

A person shall be guilty of a felony if that person attempts to persuade, or persuades a minor child under the age of sixteen (16) years, whether by words or actions or both, with intent to engage in felonious conduct against that child to either:

Leave the child’s home or school;

Enter a vehicle or building; or

Enter an area, with the intent that the child shall be concealed from public view; while the person is acting without the authority of: (i) the custodial parent of the child, (ii) the state of Rhode Island or a political subdivision of the state, or (iii) one having legal custody of the minor child. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prevent the lawful detention of a minor child or the rendering of aid or assistance to a minor child.

Every person convicted of a violation of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both fine and imprisonment.

Every person convicted of, or placed on probation for a violation of this section, may be ordered to attend appropriate professional counseling to address his or her behavior.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 203, § 1.

11-26-2.
Kidnapping with intent to extort.

Whoever commits any of the offenses mentioned in this chapter with intent to extort money or other valuable thing shall be guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for life or for any term not less than five (5) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 21; P.L. 1932, ch. 1866, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

11-26-2

.

11-26-3.
Venue of prosecutions.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter may be alleged to have been committed, and the offender may be prosecuted and punished, in any county from, through, or into which he or she has transported or carried or caused to be transported or carried another, or in which the person so transported may be found or in which the offender may be found.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 21; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 21; P.L. 1932, ch. 1866, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

11-26-3

.